Utah statutes.
48-2c-1204 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Articles of dissolution.

(1)  After any event of dissolution, other than the events described in Subsection 48-2c-1201(5) or (6), the company, or a person acting for the company, shall deliver to the division for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

(a)  the name of the company;

(b) the address to which service of process may be mailed pursuant to Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act;

(c)  the effective date of the dissolution;

(d)  the event causing the dissolution;

(e)  if dissolution occurred by written agreement of the members, a statement to that effect; and

(f)  any additional information the division determines is necessary or appropriate.

(2)  A company is dissolved upon the effective date of dissolution set forth in its articles of dissolution.



Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

